Nebraska, session 109, LB1013.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1013 LB1013
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 83-107.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-107.01 (1) The official names of the state institutions under the
supervision of the Department of Health and Human Services shall be as
follows: (a) Beatrice State Developmental Center, (b) Lincoln Regional
Center, (c) Norfolk Regional Center, and (d) Hastings Regional Center,
(e) Youth Rehabilitation and Treatment Center-Kearney , and (f) Youth
Rehabilitation and Treatment Center-Geneva.
(2)(a) This subsection applies beginning July 1, 2021.
(2)(a) (b) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(c) (2)(e) of this
section, so long as the department operates the Youth Rehabilitation and
Treatment Center-Kearney, such institution shall be a single-sex
treatment center. It may be used for the treatment of boys or girls but
not both simultaneously used for the treatment of boys only.
(c) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(e) of this section, so
long as the department operates the Youth Rehabilitation and Treatment
Center-Geneva, such institution shall be used for the treatment of girls
only.
(b) (d) For any other facility operated and utilized as a youth
rehabilitation and treatment center in compliance with state law, the
department shall ensure safe and appropriate gender separation.
(c) (e) In the event of an emergency, the department may use the
Youth Rehabilitation and Treatment Center-Kearney, the Youth
Rehabilitation and Treatment Center-Geneva, or another facility operated
and utilized as a youth rehabilitation and treatment center in compliance
with state law for the treatment of juveniles of both genders for up to
seven days. During any such use the department shall ensure safe and
appropriate gender separation.
(d) (f) For purposes of this section, emergency means a public
health emergency or a situation including fire, flood, tornado, natural
disaster, or damage to the institution that renders an institution
-2-

LB1013 LB1013
2026 2026
uninhabitable. Emergency does not include inadequate staffing.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that no institution under
the supervision of the Department of Health and Human Services at which
the department provides inpatient or subacute substance abuse or
behavioral health residential treatment for juveniles under the
jurisdiction of a juvenile court shall delay such treatment to a juvenile
when such treatment has been determined necessary under subsection (2) of
section 43-407 or has been ordered by a juvenile court.
Sec. 2. Original section 83-107.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-